src/fst/phonology.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Inari Saami morphophonological rule file

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 


!! Here we govern all morphophonological processes.

!! # Alphabet 

Alphabet   

!! ## The Inari Saami letters

 a á â ä b c d e f g h i j k l m n o õ p q !!≈ * @CODE@
 r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å               !!≈  @CODE@
 č đ ŋ ŧ š ž                               !!≈  @CODE@

 A Á Â Å B C D E F G H I J K L M N O Õ P Q !!≈ * @CODE@
 R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å               !!≈  @CODE@
 Č Đ Ŋ Ŧ Š Ž                               !!≈  @CODE@
 %-                                        !!≈ * **@CODE@** hyphen
 '       !!≈ * **@CODE@** the hyphen as hyphen
  ⎈      !!≈ * **@CODE@** the ghost sign used in compounding, does not work in hfst

!! ### Accented letters, just in case

 É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ð   !!≈ * @CODE@
 é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ð   !!≈  @CODE@
 ß ª ß ç                                   !!≈  @CODE@

 
 
!! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     !! * »
 «7     !!  «
 %[%>%] !!  >
 %[%<%] !!  <



!! ### Archiphonemes


a5:a á5:á e5:e i5:i u5:u y5:y o5:o ä5:ä  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  these do not change 
i2:i u2:u â2:â  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  this is final i, u in contract verbs etc changing to e, o
i3:i            !!≈ * **@CODE@**  this is invariant i
i4:i            !!≈ * **@CODE@**  this is the underlying i consonant
i6:0            !!≈ * **@CODE@** a fake vowel, to get WG rules to function, e.g. kyehtlov (kyehti6lov)
c5:c č5:č d5:d h5:h j5:j l5:l m5:m ŋ5:ŋ r5:r t5:t z5:z  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  these do not change
b6:b d6:d g6:g !!≈ * **@CODE@** clitic consonants, jiemge, epke
j6:0           !!≈ * **@CODE@** a fake consonant, to get WG rules to function, e.g. puávui
p4:p  k4:k  l4:l t4:t č4:č c4:c !!≈ * **@CODE@**  these are consonants that change in cg
 ':'           !!≈ * **@CODE@** is the real apostroph

!! Then some more abstract archiphonemes
!!  These are dependent upon the **Triggers** in the next section
!%^A:0		 = algan lodán
%^RC:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = root cons., lengthened by ^CLEN - máán%RCu máánnun
%^RV:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = root vowel, lengthened by ^RLEN - ta%^RVvlu taavlu 
%^SC:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = stem cons, %^SC:j, pluss lengthen after earlier shortening by %^CSH, see lyeme
%^SV:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = stem vowel, lengthened by ^SLEN u:uu - táálu%^SV tááloost
%^VO:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = vowel copy

!! ### Triggers
!! These symbols govern the behaviour of the archiphonemes above.


%^CLEN:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Cons lengthening, with ^RC
%^CSH:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Cons shortening, laaŋkku - laaŋkun
%^RVSH:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Root vowel shortening
%^FCD:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Final consonant deletion 
%^FVD:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Final vowel deletion 
%^EA:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Stem vowel: e and i to a/á in ill, and root vowel ä>á, e(e)>iä, ie>iä, ye>uá
%^EX:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Stem vowel: i to â where it should have been á, this is Err/Orth only
%^RLEN:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Root vowel lengthening
%^SLEN:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Stem vowel lengthening
%^SVLOW:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Stem vowel lowering â>á and u>o - árppu árppoin, Root vowel shortening when more than one cns in consonant centre and suffix starts with i
%^SVSH:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Stem vowel shortening kappeer kaperân
%^WG:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Weak grade trigger
%^ÁE:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = á to e in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
%^ÁI:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = á to i in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
%^VHIGH:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@** = High rootvow for verbs: e>iä, a>o, o>u, ää>áá, ee>iä, note also: ie>iä, ye>uá, uo>uá
%^VBACK:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Back rootvow for verbs: ä(ä)>a(a), á>aa, uá>o, ye>uo
%^BLOCK:0   !!≈ * **@CODE@** = This symbol just to block otherwise triggering contexts
%^IUML:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** = â to e in front of high suffixes 

!! Trigger ordering in twolc and lexc, from left to right:

!! {SV,ÁE,ÁI}  {EA,EX,SC}  {FCD|,VD} {WG,CSH} CLEN  {VHIGH,VBACK}  {RVSH,RLEN} {SLEN,SVSH}  SVLOW



!! ## Morpheme boundaries:

!! Here we define the suffix border >
!! The other borders are not used yet, but still defined:

 «  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Derivational prefix
 »  !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Derivational suffix
 %< !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Inflectional prefx
 %> !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  Inflectional suffix
 %^ !!≈ * **@CODE@**:  (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 #  !! and the symbol #, which is Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

!! End of alphabet definitions

;

!! Sets

Sets 
 Vow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å             !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
       i2 u2 â2                                !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       i3                                      !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       a5 á5 i5 u5 y5 o5 ä5                    !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       i6                                      !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý     !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å               !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý     !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       %^RV %^SV ;                             !!≈ **@CODE@** 
 RealVow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å         !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
       y5 i2 i3 i5 i6 â2                       !!≈ @CODE@
       é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý     !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å               !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý ;   !!≈ **@CODE@** 
 Cns = b c č d đ f g h j k l m n ŋ           !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
       p q r s š t ŧ v w x z ž                 !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       B C Č D Đ F G H J K L M N Ŋ             !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       P Q R S Š T Ŧ V W X Z Ž                 !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       g2 k2 m2 n2                             !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       b3 d3 g3 m3 h3                          !!≈ **@CODE@** 
       p4 k4 r4 l4  i4  t4 c4 č4               !!≈ @CODE@
       h5 j5 ŋ5 t5 c5 l5 t5 d5 r5 z5 j6        !!≈ @CODE@
       %^RC %^SC   ;                           !!≈ @CODE@
 UnvoicedCns = c č f h k p s š t  ;          !!≈ * @CODE@
 Geminate = b d g p h t k c f z l m n ŋ r s š v ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**  
 Sgm = Vow Cns ;                                  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 NotSuffixBorder = %^FCD %^FVD %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH Vow Cns ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 Triggers =        %^FCD %^FVD %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 TriggersnotFCVD =             %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ; !!≈ * @CODE@
 StemCns = b b3 d d3 g g2 g3 h h2 h3         !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
           j l m m2 m3 m8 n n8 n2 ŋ r s  ;     !!≈ **@CODE@** 




!! # Definition section

!! Introducing a WG right context 
!! ```WeakGrade =  (RealVow:) [:RealVow |i6:]  (Cns:) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:](%^ÁE:)) (%^FCD:) %^WG:0   ; ```  

Definitions

WeakGrade =         (RealVow:) [:RealVow - č: |i6:] (Vow:) (Cns:+) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:])  (%^EA:)        ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG:0 ;   
ConsonantShorting = (RealVow:) [:RealVow - č: |i6:] (Vow:) (Cns:+) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^CSH:0 ;  
Syll = :* Cns:+ Vow: :* ; 

!! As we look at more cases, the WeakGrade definition tends to be longer. 
!! We want to keep it short, but we want the code to work Thus, we document.
!! * The second :RealVow is there for long consonant stems
!! * The (Cns:) is there for consonant stems
!! * -č: is there for the č:i pair of eeč^RCi:eijijn
!! * The i6: is there for kyehtlov (kyehti6lov)



!! # Rule section

Rules

!! First we list the consonant rules, thereafter the vowel ones.

!! ## Consonant rules

!! ### Consonant gradation and shortening rules

!! First gradation and shortening. They are in the same rules, to avoid rule conflicts.

"x:y consonant gradation" ! (xxx kánske RC nubbi njuolggadusas?)
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  WG gives x:x and x:y, when there is no consonant lengthening  
Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ (%^RC: ) WeakGrade ([%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:]) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) (%^SLEN:) (%^SVLOW:) [.#.|%>|#] ; ! RC only \CLEN makes conflict
	where Cx in ( h p c č )    
              Cy in ( v v s j )    
		  matched ;

!!€ ta^RVh^RCâ^WG^VHIGH#škyett4
!!€ 
!!€ tu^RVp^RCe^WG
!!€ tu0v0e0
! käähir to käävir
!!€ käähir^WG>
!!€ käävir0>
! juáhu to juávuttáá
!!€ juáh^RCu^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ juáv0u00>ttáá



"hh:vv"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI : jäävvil
h:v <=> Vow:     _ h: WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; ! RC  !! 1) WG h:v h:
        Vow:  h: _    WeakGrade         ; ! RC  !! 2) WG h:  h:v

!kahhaan:kahanân, xxx look at this later
! kahhaan^CSH^SVSH>ân
! ka0h0an00>ân


"Quality change of root consonant x:yy"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  consonant lengthening after WG, changing h:v, p:v, c:s
Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ %^RC: :Vow+ Cns:* [Triggers: -  %^FCD:]* %^WG: %^CLEN: (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) ([%^SVLOW: |%^SLEN:]) %> [i:|s|u|o|ž|e h|e m|á] ; ! RC
	where Cx in ( h p c )
	      Cy in ( v v s ) 
		  matched ;

!!€ va^RVh%^RCo^WG^CLEN>im
!!€ va0vvo00>im


"t:đ, also tk4:đh gradation, part 1" 
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   
t:đ <=> Vow: _ k4: (%^RC:) WeakGrade ;       ! RC !! 1) tk4:đk WG 
        Vow: _     (%^RC:) WeakGrade  ;      ! RC !! 2) čyet%^RCi3:čyeđi
        Vow: _ j           WeakGrade  ;      ! RC !! 3) vitjá:viđjá
        Vow: _     (%^RC:) â: %^FVD: %^WG: ; ! 18.11.20
!        Vow: _   t4: WeakGrade %^CLEN: ;    ! RC !! 2) tt4:đđ 

!!€ puáttee#vuot^RCâ^FVD^WG>i5i5
!!€ puáttee#vuođ0000>ii
!!€ jo^RVtk4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ joođhâ00>
!!€ vädis#vuot^RCâ^FVD^WG>i5i5
!!€ vädis#vuođ0000>ii

"k4:h gradation for kk4, tk4, rkk4, lkk4"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  
k4:h <=> Vow: [t:|k:]            _ WeakGrade ; ! RC !! 1) WG atka:ađha, kk4:h
         Vow: [l|r|v|i4:|đ|j] k: _ WeakGrade ; ! RC !! 2) e.g. rkk:rh

!!€ totk4os^WG
!!€ tođhos0


"xx:yy gradation for xx4"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   puáhhoin, sukk4á:suhháást
Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _  Cz:Cy WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; ! RC 
	where Cx in ( k  c  p ) 
	      Cy in ( h  s  v ) 
	      Cz in ( k4 c4 p4  ) 
		  matched ;
         
!!€ mä^RVtk4i^WG^RLEN>.#.
!!€ määđhi00>.#.

!!€ su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ su0hháá000>st



"t4:đ and c4, č4, p4 gradation for tt:đ etc."
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** 
Cy:Cz <=> Cx: _  WeakGrade ;  !! čuottâlm:čuođâlm njuottâs 
       where Cx in ( t  c  č  p  ) 
             Cy in ( t4 c4 č4 p4 ) 
             Cz in ( đ  s  j  v  ) 
       matched ;

!!€ ru^RVtt4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ ruu0đâ00>
 


"ht:vt, ks:vs etc. gradation"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  ht:vt, we use h 
Cx:v <=>  _  Cz (%^RC:) Vow:+ (%^SV: ) (Cns:+) ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^EA:) ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG: ; ! RC !! 1) pi%^RVhtâs
          _  Cz t Vow ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG: ;       ! RC !! 2) tekstâ
       where Cx in ( h k4 k4 h h ) 
             Cz in ( t s  š č c ) 
       matched ;


!!€ pihtâs^WG
!!€ pivtâs0



!! ### Consonant shortening rules

"k:0 gradation and shortening for xkk4"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for lkk4, rkk4, vkk4
k:0 <=> Vow: [l|j|r|v|i4:|đ] _ k4:h WeakGrade        (%^CLEN: ) (%^VBACK:) (%^SVLOW:) ; ! RC !! 1) WG 
        Vow: [l|j|r|v|i4:|đ] _ k4:k Vow: ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) %^CSH: (%^VBACK:) (%^RLEN:) [.#.| %>] ; ! RC !! 2) CSH 
